North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-36.
Accidents taking place outside State; employees receiving compensation from another state.

Where an accident happens while the employee is employed elsewhere than in this State and the accident is one which would entitle him or his dependents or next of kin to compensation if it had happened in this State, then the employee or his dependents or next of kin shall be entitled to compensation (i) if the contract of employment was made in this State, (ii) if the employer’s principal place of business is in this State, or (iii) if the employee’s principal place of employment is within this State; provided, however, that if an employee or his dependents or next of kin shall receive compensation or damages under the laws of any other state nothing herein contained shall be construed so as to permit a total compensation for the same injury greater than is provided for in this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 36; 1963, c. 450, s. 2; 1967, c. 1229, s. 3; 1973, c. 1059; 1991, c. 284, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of this section, see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 427 (1930).

For note on the application of full faith and credit to workers’ compensation statutes and awards, see 34 N.C.L. Rev. 501 (1956).

For case law survey on conflict of laws, see 43 N.C.L. Rev. 895 (1965).

For article, “Recognition of Foreign Judgments,” see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 21 (1971).

§ 97-37.
Where injured employee dies before total compensation is paid.

When an employee receives or is entitled to compensation under this Article for an injury covered by

G.S. 97-31

and dies from any other cause than the injury for which he was entitled to compensation, payment of the unpaid balance of compensation shall be made: First, to the surviving whole dependents; second, to partial dependents, and, if no dependents, to the next of kin as defined in the Article; if there are no whole or partial dependents or next of kin as defined in the Article, then to the personal representative, in lieu of the compensation the employee would have been entitled to had he lived.

Provided, however, that if the death is due to a cause that is compensable under this Article, and the dependents of such employee are awarded compensation therefor, all right to unpaid compensation provided by this section shall cease and determine.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 37; 1947, c. 823; 1971, c. 322.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1980 tort law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1239 (1981).

§ 97-38.
Where death results proximately from compensable injury or occupational disease; dependents; burial expenses; compensation to aliens; election by partial dependents.

If death results proximately from a compensable injury or occupational disease and within six years thereafter, or within two years of the final determination of disability, whichever is later, the employer shall pay or cause to be paid, subject to the provisions of other sections of this Article, weekly payments of compensation equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66 2/3%) of the average weekly wages of the deceased employee at the time of the accident, but not more than the amount established annually to be effective October 1 as provided in

G.S. 97-29

, nor less than thirty dollars ($30.00), per week, and burial expenses not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), to the person or persons entitled thereto as follows:

Persons wholly dependent for support upon the earnings of the deceased employee at the time of the accident shall be entitled to receive the entire compensation payable share and share alike to the exclusion of all other persons. If there be only one person wholly dependent, then that person shall receive the entire compensation payable.

If there is no person wholly dependent, then any person partially dependent for support upon the earnings of the deceased employee at the time of the accident shall be entitled to receive a weekly payment of compensation computed as hereinabove provided, but such weekly payment shall be the same proportion of the weekly compensation provided for a whole dependent as the amount annually contributed by the deceased employee to the support of such partial dependent bears to the annual earnings of the deceased at the time of the accident.

If there is no person wholly dependent, and the person or all persons partially dependent is or are within the classes of persons defined as “next of kin” in

G.S. 97-40

, whether or not such persons or such classes of persons are of kin to the deceased employee in equal degree, and all so elect, he or they may take, share and share alike, the commuted value of the amount provided for whole dependents in (1) above instead of the proportional payment provided for partial dependents in (2) above; provided, that the election herein provided may be exercised on behalf of any infant partial dependent by a duly qualified guardian; provided, further, that the Industrial Commission may, in its discretion, permit a parent or person standing in loco parentis to such infant to exercise such option in its behalf, the award to be payable only to a duly qualified guardian except as in this Article otherwise provided; and provided, further, that if such election is exercised by or on behalf of more than one person, then they shall take the commuted amount in equal shares.When weekly payments have been made to an injured employee before his death, the compensation to dependents shall begin from the date of the last of such payments. Compensation payments due on account of death shall be paid for a period of 500 weeks from the date of the death of the employee; provided, however, after said 500-week period in case of a widow or widower who is unable to support herself or himself because of physical or mental disability as of the date of death of the employee, compensation payments shall continue during her or his lifetime or until remarriage and compensation payments due a dependent child shall be continued until such child reaches the age of 18.Compensation payable under this Article to aliens not residents (or about to become nonresidents) of the United States or Canada, shall be the same in amounts as provided for residents, except that dependents in any foreign country except Canada shall be limited to surviving spouse and child or children, or if there be no surviving spouse or child or children, to the surviving father or mother.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 38; 1943, c. 163; c. 502, s. 5; 1947, c. 823; 1951, c. 70, s. 3; 1953, c. 53, s. 1; 1955, c. 1026, s. 8; 1957, c. 1217; 1963, c. 604, s. 3; 1967, c. 84, s. 4; 1969, c. 143, s. 4; 1971, c. 281, s. 3; 1973, c. 515, s. 4; c. 759, s. 4; c. 1308, ss. 3, 4; c. 1357, ss. 1, 2; 1977, c. 409; 1981, c. 276, s. 1; c. 378, s. 1; c. 379; 1983, c. 772, s. 1; 1987, c. 729, s. 9; 1997-301, s. 1; 2001-232, s. 1; 2011-287, s. 14.

Cross References.

As to division od death benefits among whole and partial dependents, see

G.S. 97-39

.

§ 97-39.
Widow, widower, or child to be conclusively presumed to be dependent; other cases determined upon facts; division of death benefits among those wholly dependent; when division among partially dependent.

A widow, a widower and/or a child shall be conclusively presumed to be wholly dependent for support upon the deceased employee. In all other cases questions of dependency, in whole or in part shall be determined in accordance with the facts as the facts may be at the time of the accident, but no allowance shall be made for any payment made in lieu of board and lodging or services, and no compensation shall be allowed unless the dependency existed for a period of three months or more prior to the accident. If there is more than one person wholly dependent, the death benefit shall be divided among them, the persons partly dependent, if any, shall receive no part thereof. If there is no one wholly dependent, and more than one person partially dependent, the death benefit shall be divided among them according to the relative extent of their dependency.

The widow, or widower and all children of deceased employees shall be conclusively presumed to be dependents of deceased and shall be entitled to receive the benefits of this Article for the full periods specified herein.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 39.

Cross References.

For definition of terms “widow,” “widower,” and “child,” see

G.S. 97-2

.

As to dependents, see also

G.S. 97-38

.

Legal Periodicals.

As to determination of the extent of the dependency of partial dependents, see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 426 (1930).

For note, “Winstead v. Derreberry: Stepchildren and the Presumption of Dependence Under the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1548 (1986).

§ 97-40.
Commutation and payment of compensation in absence of dependents; “next of kin” defined; commutation and distribution of compensation to partially dependent next of kin; payment in absence of both dependents and next of kin.

Subject to the provisions of

G.S. 97-38

, if the deceased employee leaves neither whole nor partial dependents, then the compensation which would be payable under

G.S. 97-38

to whole dependents shall be commuted to its present value and paid in a lump sum to the next of kin as herein defined. For purposes of this section and G.S. 97-38, “next of kin” shall include only child, father, mother, brother or sister of the deceased employee, including adult children or adult brothers or adult sisters of the deceased, but excluding a parent who has willfully abandoned the care and maintenance of his or her child and who has not resumed its care and maintenance at least one year prior to the first occurring of the majority or death of the child and continued its care and maintenance until its death or majority. For all such next of kin who are neither wholly nor partially dependent upon the deceased employee and who take under this section, the order of priority among them shall be governed by the general law applicable to the distribution of the personal estate of persons dying intestate. In the event of exclusion of a parent based on abandonment, the claim for compensation benefits shall be treated as though the abandoning parent had predeceased the employee. For all such next of kin who were also partially dependent on the deceased employee but who exercise the election provided for partial dependents by G.S. 97-38, the general law applicable to the distribution of the personal estate of persons dying intestate shall not apply and such person or persons upon the exercise of such election, shall be entitled, share and share alike, to the compensation provided in G.S. 97-38 for whole dependents commuted to its present value and paid in a lump sum.

If the deceased employee leaves neither whole dependents, partial dependents, nor next of kin as hereinabove defined, then no compensation shall be due or payable on account of the death of the deceased employee, except that the employer shall pay or cause to be paid the burial expenses of the deceased employee not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to the person or persons entitled thereto.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 40; 1931, c. 274, s. 5; c. 319; 1945, c. 766; 1953, c. 53, s. 2; c. 1135, s. 2; 1963, c. 604, s. 4; 1965, c. 419; 1967, c. 84, s. 5; 1971, c. 1179; 1981, c. 379; 1987, c. 729, s. 10; 2001-232, s. 3.1; 2011-287, s. 15.

§ 97-40.1.
Second Injury Fund.

There is hereby created a fund to be known as the “Second Injury Fund,” to be held and disbursed by the Industrial Commission as hereinafter provided.For the purpose of providing money for said fund the Industrial Commission may assess against the employer or its insurance carrier the payment of not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for the loss, or loss of use, of each minor member in every case of a permanent partial disability where there is such loss, and shall assess not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for fifty percent (50%) or more loss or loss of use of each major member, defined as back, foot, leg, hand, arm, eye, or hearing.

The Industrial Commission shall disburse moneys from the Second Injury Fund in unusual cases of second injuries as follows:

To pay additional compensation in cases of second injuries referred to in

G.S. 97-33

; provided, however, that the original injury and the subsequent injury were each at least twenty percent (20%) of the entire member; and, provided further, that such additional compensation, when added to the compensation awarded under said section, shall not exceed the amount which would have been payable for both injuries had both been sustained in the subsequent accident.

To pay additional compensation to an injured employee who has sustained permanent total disability in the manner referred to in the second paragraph of

G.S. 97-35

, which shall be in addition to the compensation awarded under said section; provided, however, that such additional compensation, when added to the compensation awarded under said section, shall not exceed the compensation for permanent total disability as provided for in

G.S. 97-29

.

To pay compensation and medical expense in cases of permanent and total disability resulting from an injury to the brain or spinal cord in the manner and to the extent hereinafter provided.The additional compensation and treatment expenses herein provided for shall be paid out of the Second Injury Fund exclusively and only to the extent to which the assets of such fund shall permit.

In addition to payments for the purposes hereinabove set forth, the Industrial Commission may, in its discretion, make payments from said fund for the following purposes and under the following conditions:

In any case in which total and permanent disability due to paralysis or loss of mental capacity has resulted from an injury to the brain or spinal cord, the Industrial Commission may, in its discretion enter an award and pay compensation and reasonable and necessary medical, nursing, hospital, institutional, equipment, and other treatment expenses from the Second Injury Fund during the life of the injured employee in cases where the injury giving rise to such disability occurred prior to July 1, 1953, and the last payment of compensation has been made subsequent to January 1, 1941. Such compensation and medical expense shall be paid only from April 4, 1947, and after the employer’s liability for compensation and treatment expense has ended, and in every case in which the injury resulting in paralysis due to injury to the spinal cord occurred subsequent to April 4, 1947, and prior to July 1, 1953, the liability of the employer and his insurance carrier to pay compensation and medical expense during the life of the injured employee shall not be affected by this section.

When compensation is allowed from the fund in any case under subdivision (1) of subsection (c), the Commission may in its discretion authorize payment of medical, nursing, hospital, equipment, and other treatment expenses incurred prior to the date compensation is allowed and after the employer’s liability has ended if funds are reasonably available in the Second Injury Fund for such purpose after paying claims in cases of second injuries as specified in

G.S. 97-33

and 97-35. Should the fund be insufficient to pay both compensation and treatment expenses, then the said expenses may, in the discretion of the Commission, be paid first and compensation thereafter according to the reasonable availability of funds in the fund.

History.

1953, c. 1135, s. 2; 1957, c. 1396, s. 4; 1963, c. 450, s. 3; 1977, c. 457; 1991, c. 703, s. 11; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 6.1.

§ 97-41.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1308, s. 5.

§ 97-42.
Deduction of payments.

Payments made by the employer to the injured employee during the period of his disability, or to his dependents, which by the terms of this Article were not due and payable when made, may, subject to the approval of the Commission be deducted from the amount to be paid as compensation. Provided, that in the case of disability such deductions shall be made by shortening the period during which compensation must be paid, and not by reducing the amount of the weekly payment. Unless otherwise provided by the plan, when payments are made to an injured employee pursuant to an employer-funded salary continuation, disability or other income replacement plan, the deduction shall be calculated from payments made by the employer in each week during which compensation was due and payable, without any carry-forward or carry-back of credit for amounts paid in excess of the compensation rate in any given week.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 42; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 3.7.

§ 97-42.1.
Credit for unemployment benefits.

If an injured employee has received unemployment benefits under the Employment Security Law for any week with respect to which he is entitled to workers’ compensation benefits for temporary total or permanent and total disability, the employment benefits paid for such weeks may be deducted from the award to be paid as compensation. If an injured employee has received unemployment benefits for any week with respect to which he is entitled to workers’ compensation benefits for partial disability as provided in

G.S. 97-30

, the unemployment benefits paid for such weeks may be deducted from the award to be paid only to the extent that the sum of the unemployment benefits and workers’ compensation payable for such week exceeds two-thirds of the injured employee’s average weekly wages as determined by the Commission in accordance with

G.S. 97-2(5)

. Benefits payable under

G.S. 97-31

for permanent partial disability or other permanent injury shall not be subject to reduction because of the receipt of unemployment benefits.

History.

1985, c. 616, s. 1.

§ 97-43.
Commission may prescribe monthly or quarterly payments.

The Industrial Commission, upon application of either party, may, in its discretion, having regard to the welfare of the employee and the convenience of the employer, authorize compensation to be paid monthly or quarterly instead of weekly.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 43.

§ 97-44.
Lump sums.

Whenever any weekly payment has been continued for not less than six weeks, the liability therefor may, in unusual cases, where the Industrial Commission deems it to be to the best interest of the employee or his dependents, or where it will prevent undue hardships on the employer or his insurance carrier, without prejudicing the interests of the employee or his dependents, be redeemed, in whole or in part, by the payment by the employer of a lump sum which shall be fixed by the Commission, but in no case to exceed the uncommuted value of the future installments which may be due under this Article. The Commission, however, in its discretion, may at any time in the case of a minor who has received permanently disabling injuries either partial or total provide that he be compensated, in whole or in part, by the payment of a lump sum, the amount of which shall be fixed by the Commission, but in no case to exceed the uncommuted value of the future installments which may be due under this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 44; 1963, c. 450, s. 4; 1975, c. 255.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of this section, see 8 N.C.L. Rev. 427 (1930).

§ 97-45.
Reducing to judgment outstanding liability of insurance carriers withdrawing from State.

Upon the withdrawal of any insurance carrier from doing business in the State that has any outstanding liability under the Workers’ Compensation Act, the Insurance Commissioner shall immediately notify the North Carolina Industrial Commission, and thereupon the said North Carolina Industrial Commission shall issue an award against said insurance carrier and commute the installments due the injured employee or employees, and immediately have said award docketed in the superior court of the county in which the claimant resides, and the said North Carolina Industrial Commission shall then cause suit to be brought on said judgment in the state of the residence of any such insurance carrier, and the proceeds from said judgment after deducting the cost, if any, of the proceeding, shall be turned over to the injured employee, or employees, taking from such employee, or employees, the proper receipt in satisfaction of his claim.

History.

1933, c. 474; 1979, c. 714, s. 2.

§ 97-46.
Lump sum payments to trustee; receipt to discharge employer.

Whenever the Industrial Commission deems it expedient any lump sum, subject to the provisions of

G.S. 97-44

, shall be paid by the employer to some suitable person or corporation appointed by the superior court in the county wherein the accident occurred, as trustee, to administer the same for the benefit of the person entitled thereto, in the manner provided by the Commission. The receipt of such trustee for the amount as paid shall discharge the employer or anyone else who is liable therefor.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 45.

§ 97-47.
Change of condition; modification of award.

Upon its own motion or upon the application of any party in interest on the grounds of a change in condition, the Industrial Commission may review any award, and on such review may make an award ending, diminishing, or increasing the compensation previously awarded, subject to the maximum or minimum provided in this Article, and shall immediately send to the parties a copy of the award. No such review shall affect such award as regards any moneys paid but no such review shall be made after two years from the date of the last payment of compensation pursuant to an award under this Article, except that in cases in which only medical or other treatment bills are paid, no such review shall be made after 12 months from the date of the last payment of bills for medical or other treatment, paid pursuant to this Article.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 46; 1931, c. 274, s. 6; 1947, c. 823; 1973, c. 1060, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on the range of compensable consequences of a work-related injury, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 583 (1971).

For survey of 1976 case law on workers’ compensation, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1116 (1977).

For Survey of Developments in North Carolina Law (1992), see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1893 (1993).

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

For note, “The Fairness Requirement for a Workers’ Compensation Agreement — The Effect of Vernon v. Steven L. Mabe Builders,” see 17 Campbell L. Rev. 521 (1995).

§ 97-47.1.
Payment without prejudice; limitations period.

When the employer has paid compensation without prejudice but timely contested liability as provided in G.S. 97-18(d), the right, if any, to further indemnity compensation and medical compensation shall terminate two years after the employer’s last payment of medical or indemnity compensation, whichever last occurs, unless the employee files with the Commission a claim for further compensation prior to the expiration of this period.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 3.5.

§ 97-48.
Receipts relieving employer; payment to minors; when payment of claims to dependents subsequent in right discharges employer.

Whenever payment of compensation is made to a widow or widower for her or his use, or for her or his use and the use of the child or children, the written receipt thereof of such widow or widower shall acquit the employer: Provided, however, that in order to protect the interests of minors or incompetents the Industrial Commission may at its discretion change the terms of any award with respect to whom compensation for the benefit of such minors or incompetents shall be paid.

Whenever payment is made to any person 18 years of age or over, the written receipt of such person shall acquit the employer.

Payment of death benefits by an employer in good faith to a dependent subsequent in right to another or other dependents shall protect and discharge the employer, unless and until such dependent or dependents prior in right shall have given notice of his or their claims. In case the employer is in doubt as to the respective rights of rival claimants, he may apply to the Industrial Commission to decide between them.

A minor employee under the age of 18 years may sign agreements and receipts for payments of compensation for temporary total disability, and such agreements and receipts executed by such minor shall acquit the employer. Where the injury results in a permanent disability and the sum to be paid does not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00) the minor employee may execute agreements and sign receipts and such agreements and receipts shall acquit the employer; provided, that when deemed necessary the Commission may require the signature of a parent or person standing in place of a parent.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 47; 1931, c. 274, s. 7; 1945, c. 766.

§ 97-49.
Benefits of mentally incompetent or minor employees under 18 may be paid to a trustee, etc.

If an injured employee is mentally incompetent or is under 18 years of age at the time when any right or privilege accrues to him under this Article, his guardian, trustee or committee may in his behalf claim and exercise such right or privilege.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 48.

§ 97-50.
Limitation as against minors or mentally incompetent.

No limitation of time provided in this Article for the giving of notice or making claim under this Article shall run against any person who is mentally incompetent, or a minor dependent, as long as he has no guardian, trustee, or committee.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 49.

§ 97-51.
Joint employment; liabilities.

Whenever an employee, for whose injury or death compensation is payable under this Article, shall at the time of the injury be in joint service of two or more employers subject to this Article, such employers shall contribute to the payment of such compensation in proportion to their wages liability to such employee; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall prevent any reasonable arrangement between such employers for a different distribution as between themselves of the ultimate burden of compensation.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 50.

§ 97-52.
Occupational disease made compensable; “accident” defined.

Disablement or death of an employee resulting from an occupational disease described in

G.S. 97-53

shall be treated as the happening of an injury by accident within the meaning of the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act and the procedure and practice and compensation and other benefits provided by said act shall apply in all such cases except as hereinafter otherwise provided. The word “accident,” as used in the Workers’ Compensation Act, shall not be construed to mean a series of events in employment, of a similar or like nature, occurring regularly, continuously or at frequent intervals in the course of such employment, over extended periods of time, whether such events may or may not be attributable to fault of the employer and disease attributable to such causes shall be compensable only if culminating in an occupational disease mentioned in and compensable under this Article: Provided, however, no compensation shall be payable for asbestosis and/or silicosis as hereinafter defined if the employee, at the time of entering into the employment of the employer by whom compensation would otherwise be payable, falsely represented himself in writing as not having previously been disabled or laid off because of asbestosis or silicosis.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1979, c. 714, s. 2.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

For comment on injury by accident in workers’ compensation, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 175 (1980).

For note on occupational disease under workers’ compensation statute, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 288 (1980).

For survey of 1982 law on workers’ compensation, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1243 (1983).

For discussion of occupational disease compensation in light of Rutledge v. Tultex Corp./Kings Yarn,

308 N.C. 85

, 301 S.E.2d 370 (1983), see 62 N.C.L. Rev. 573 (1984).

For note discussing proof of causation requirement in occupational disease cases, in light of Rutledge v. Tultex Corp./Kings Yarn,

308 N.C. 85

, 301 S.E.2d 359 (1983), see 7 Campbell L. Rev. 99 (1984).

For note, “Caulder v. Waverly Mills: Expanding the Definition of an Occupational Disease Under the Last Injurious Exposure Rule,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1566 (1986).

For comment, “A Proposal to Reform the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act to Address Mental-Mental Claims,” see 32 Wake Forest L. Rev. 193 (1997).

For comment on the reality of work-related stress, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 321 (1998).

§ 97-53.
(See editor’s note on condition precedent) Occupational diseases enumerated; when due to exposure to chemicals.

The following diseases and conditions only shall be deemed to be occupational diseases within the meaning of this Article:

Anthrax.

Arsenic poisoning.

Brass poisoning.

Zinc poisoning.

Manganese poisoning.

Lead poisoning. Provided the employee shall have been exposed to the hazard of lead poisoning for at least 30 days in the preceding 12 months’ period; and, provided further, only the employer in whose employment such employee was last injuriously exposed shall be liable.

Mercury poisoning.

Phosphorus poisoning.

Poisoning by carbon bisulphide, menthanol, naphtha or volatile halogenated hydrocarbons.

Chrome ulceration.

Compressed-air illness.

Poisoning by benzol, or by nitro and amido derivatives of benzol (dinitrolbenzol, anilin, and others).

Any disease, other than hearing loss covered in another subdivision of this section, which is proven to be due to causes and conditions which are characteristic of and peculiar to a particular trade, occupation or employment, but excluding all ordinary diseases of life to which the general public is equally exposed outside of the employment.

Epitheliomatous cancer or ulceration of the skin or of the corneal surface of the eye due to tar, pitch, bitumen, mineral oil, or paraffin, or any compound, product, or residue of any of these substances.

Radium poisoning or disability or death due to radioactive properties of substances or to roentgen rays, X rays or exposure to any other source of radiation; provided, however, that the disease under this subdivision shall be deemed to have occurred on the date that disability or death shall occur by reason of such disease.

Blisters due to use of tools or appliances in the employment.

Bursitis due to intermittent pressure in the employment.

Miner’s nystagmus.

Bone felon due to constant or intermittent pressure in employment.

Synovitis, caused by trauma in employment.

Tenosynovitis, caused by trauma in employment.

Carbon monoxide poisoning.

Poisoning by sulphuric, hydrochloric or hydrofluoric acid.

Asbestosis.

Silicosis.

Psittacosis.

Undulant fever.

Loss of hearing caused by harmful noise in the employment. The following rules shall be applicable in determining eligibility for compensation and the period during which compensation shall be payable:

The term “harmful noise” means sound in employment capable of producing occupational loss of hearing as hereinafter defined. Sound of an intensity of less than 90 decibels, A scale, shall be deemed incapable of producing occupational loss of hearing as defined in this section.

“Occupational loss of hearing” shall mean a permanent sensorineural loss of hearing in both ears caused by prolonged exposure to harmful noise in employment. Except in instances of preexisting loss of hearing due to disease, trauma, or congenital deafness in one ear, no compensation shall be payable under this subdivision unless prolonged exposure to harmful noise in employment has caused loss of hearing in both ears as hereinafter provided.

No compensation benefits shall be payable for temporary total or temporary partial disability under this subdivision and there shall be no award for tinnitus or a psychogenic hearing loss.

An employer shall become liable for the entire occupational hearing loss to which his employment has contributed, but if previous deafness is established by a hearing test or other competent evidence, whether or not the employee was exposed to harmful noise within six months preceding such test, the employer shall not be liable for previous loss so established, nor shall he be liable for any loss for which compensation has previously been paid or awarded and the employer shall be liable only for the difference between the percent of occupational hearing loss determined as of the date of disability as herein defined and the percentage of loss established by the preemployment and audiometric examination excluding, in any event, hearing losses arising from nonoccupational causes.

In the evaluation of occupational hearing loss, only the hearing levels at the frequencies of 500, 1,000, 2,000, and 3,000 cycles per second shall be considered. Hearing losses for frequencies below 500 and above 3,000 cycles per second are not to be considered as constituting compensable hearing disability.

The employer liable for the compensation in this section shall be the employer in whose employment the employee was last exposed to harmful noise in North Carolina during a period of 90 working days or parts thereof, and an exposure during a period of less than 90 working days or parts thereof shall be held not to be an injurious exposure; provided, however, that in the event an insurance carrier has been on the risk for a period of time during which an employee has been injuriously exposed to harmful noise, and if after insurance carrier goes off the risk said employee has been further exposed to harmful noise, although not exposed for 90 working days or parts thereof so as to constitute an injurious exposure, such carrier shall, nevertheless, be liable.

The percentage of hearing loss shall be calculated as the average, in decibels, of the thresholds of hearing for the frequencies of 500, 1,000, 2,000, and 3,000 cycles per second. Pure tone air conduction audiometric instruments, properly calibrated according to accepted national standards such as American Standards Association, Inc., (ASA), International Standards Organization (ISO), or American National Standards Institute, Inc., (ANSI), shall be used for measuring hearing loss. If more than one audiogram is taken, the audiogram having the lowest threshold will be used to calculate occupational hearing loss. If the losses of hearing average 15 decibels (26 db if ANSI or ISO) or less in the four frequencies, such losses of hearing shall not constitute any compensable hearing disability. If the losses of hearing average 82 decibels (93 db if ANSI or ISO) or more in the four frequencies, then the same shall constitute and be total or one hundred percent (100%) compensable hearing loss. In measuring hearing impairment, the lowest measured losses in each of the four frequencies shall be added together and divided by four to determine the average decibel loss. For each decibel of loss exceeding 15 decibels (26 db if ANSI or ISO) an allowance of one and one-half percent (11/2%) shall be made up to the maximum of one hundred percent (100%) which is reached at 82 decibels (93 db if ANSI or ISO). In determining the binaural percentage of loss, the percentage of impairment in the better ear shall be multiplied by five. The resulting figure shall be added to the percentage of impairment in the poorer ear, and the sum of the two divided by six. The final percentage shall represent the binaural hearing impairment.

There shall be payable for total occupational loss of hearing in both ears 150 weeks of compensation, and for partial occupational loss of hearing in both ears such proportion of these periods of payment as such partial loss bears to total loss.

No claim for compensation for occupational hearing loss shall be filed until after six months have elapsed since exposure to harmful noise with the last employer. The last day of such exposure shall be the date of disability. The regular use of employer-provided protective devices capable of preventing loss of hearing from the particular harmful noise where the employee works shall constitute removal from exposure to such particular harmful noise.

No consideration shall be given to the question of whether or not the ability of an employee to understand speech is improved by the use of a hearing aid. The North Carolina Industrial Commission may order the employer to provide the employee with an original hearing aid if it will materially improve the employee’s ability to hear.

No compensation benefits shall be payable for the loss of hearing caused by harmful noise after October 1, 1971, if employee fails to regularly utilize employer-provided protection device or devices, capable of preventing loss of hearing from the particular harmful noise where the employee works.

(See editor’s note on condition precedent) Infection with smallpox, infection with vaccinia, or any adverse medical reaction when the infection or adverse reaction is due to the employee receiving in employment vaccination against smallpox incident to the Administration of Smallpox Countermeasures by Health Professionals, section 304 of the Homeland Security Act, Pub. L. No. 107-296 (Nov. 25, 2002) (to be codified at 42 U.S.C. § 233(p)), or when the infection or adverse medical reaction is due to the employee being exposed to another employee vaccinated as described in this subdivision.

Occupational diseases caused by chemicals shall be deemed to be due to exposure of an employee to the chemicals herein mentioned only when as a part of the employment such employee is exposed to such chemicals in such form and quantity, and used with such frequency as to cause the occupational disease mentioned in connection with such chemicals.

History.

1935, c. 123; 1949, c. 1078; 1953, c. 1112; 1955, c. 1026, s. 10; 1957, c. 1396, s. 6; 1963, c. 553, s. 1; c. 965; 1971, c. 547, s. 1; c. 1108, s. 1; 1973, c. 760, ss. 1, 2; 1975, c. 718, s. 4; 1987, c. 729, ss. 11, 12; 1991, c. 703, s. 10; 2003-169, s. 2.

Condition Precedent to Recovery Under this Act.

Session Laws
2003-169, s. 7, provides: “In the event that federal regulatory or statutory provisions providing compensation and benefits to persons for infection with smallpox, infection with vaccinia, or any adverse medical reaction incident to the Administration of Smallpox Countermeasures by Health Professionals, section 304 of the Homeland Security Act, Pub. L. No. 107-296 (Nov. 25, 2002) (to be codified at
42 U.S.C. § 233(p)) are adopted, a condition precedent to recovery under this act shall be that the person claiming compensation and benefits under this act shall first seek compensation and benefits under the federal provisions, with those provisions constituting primary coverage and the person then being entitled to compensation and benefits under this act not exceeding a total recovery under the federal provisions and this act equal to the amount available under the applicable provisions of this act.”